New Jersey, session 222, A1292.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, any local government entity that acquires ownership of real property through bankruptcy, tax delinquency, abandonment, escheat, eminent domain, condemnation, or any circumstance in which the government entity involuntarily acquires title by virtue of its function as sovereign, or acquires the property by any means for the purpose of promoting the redevelopment of that property and is exempt from joint and several liability pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection d. of section 8 of the "Spill Compensation and Control Act," P.L.1976, c.141 (C.58:10-23.11g), shall also be exempt from annual remediation fees for the property imposed by the department pursuant to the "Site Remediation Reform Act," sections 1 through 29 of P.L.2009, c.60 (C.58:10C-1 et seq.) and the "Brownfield and Contaminated Site Remediation Act," P.L.1997, c.278 (C.58:10B-1.1 et al.) for any discharge that occurred or began prior to the government entitys ownership. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.